Utah statutes.
78A-1-104.   Number of juvenile judges and jurisdictions.

The number of juvenile court judges shall be:

(1)  two juvenile judges in the First Juvenile District;

(2)  six juvenile judges in the Second Juvenile District;

(3)  10 juvenile judges in the Third Juvenile District;

(4)  four juvenile judges in the Fourth Juvenile District;

(5)  three juvenile judges in the Fifth Juvenile District;

(6)  one juvenile judge in the Sixth Juvenile District;

(7)  two juvenile judges in the Seventh Juvenile District; and

(8)  one juvenile judge in the Eighth Juvenile District.



Amended by Chapter 32, 2010 General Session

